Florida, session 2026, HB225.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 180.191, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
(Substantial rewording of section. See
s. 180.191, F.S., for present text.)
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 225 2026
180.191 Consumer fairness in utility rates.—
(1) This section may be cited as the "Consumer Fairness in
Utility Rates Act of 2025."
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Facility" means a water treatment facility, a
wastewater treatment facility, a pumping station, a well, or
other physical component of a utility system.
(b) "Recipient municipality" means a municipality that
receives water or sewer service from another municipality's
utility system.
(3) A municipality operating a water or sewer utility that
has a facility located within a recipient municipality must
impose the same base rates, fees, and charges on consumers
within the recipient municipality as it does on consumers within
its municipal boundaries.
(4)(a) A municipality operating a water or sewer utility
that has a facility located within a recipient municipality may
not impose a surcharge on consumers within the boundaries of the
recipient municipality unless the surcharge is:
1. Directly tied to documented costs of service,
maintenance, or infrastructure investment; and
2. Clearly disclosed to the consumer in writing at the
time of billing.
(b) Surcharges may not be used as a general revenue source
or profit margin.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 225 2026
(5) Before establishing or adjusting rates, fees, or
surcharges, a municipality operating a water or sewer utility
that has a facility located within a recipient municipality must
hold a public hearing to allow input from consumers within its
municipal boundaries and the boundaries of the recipient
municipality.
(6) A municipality operating a water or sewer utility must
file an annual report with the Public Service Commission
detailing the use of surcharge revenues.
(7) Consumer disputes over rates, fees, or surcharges must
be reviewed by the Public Service Commission for a determination
of fairness and compliance with this section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb225-00